Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Military Family Assistance Trust Fund

36.470.
Military family assistance trust fund.

The military family assistance trust fund is created as a separate revolving fund. The trust fund shall consist of grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purpose of the trust fund.

Trust fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become a part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 1, effective April 25, 2006.

36.472.
Military family assistance trust fund board — Membership — Terms — Meetings.

The military family assistance trust fund board is hereby created for the purpose of administering the trust fund created under KRS

36.470

. The board shall be attached to the Department of Military Affairs for administrative purposes. The board shall be composed of seven (7) members as follows:

Four (4) members, expert in military family matters, at least one (1) of whom shall be a member of the Kentucky National Guard, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member, expert in military family matters, appointed by the President of the Senate;

One (1) member, expert in military family matters, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and

The adjutant general, who shall serve as a nonvoting member.

Appointments referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made within sixty (60) days of April 25, 2006.

The adjutant general, or a majority of the board members, shall arrange for the first board meeting as soon as possible after all board members are appointed, but no later than June 15, 2006.

Appointed board members shall serve without compensation but may receive reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The term of each appointed member shall be four (4) years, except any person serving on the board prior to July 15, 2012, shall serve until the expiration of his or her current term. The subsequent appointments shall be for terms as follows:

The Governor shall appoint two (2) members to a term of two (2) years and two (2) members to a term of three (3) years; the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one (1) member to a term of four (4) years; and

Upon expiration of the terms established in paragraph (a) of this subsection, all appointments shall be for a term of four (4) years.

An appointed member whose term has expired may continue to serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies. A member who is appointed to an unexpired term shall serve the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies. A member may serve two (2) consecutive four (4) year terms and shall not be reappointed for four (4) years after the completion of those terms.

A majority of the full membership of the board shall constitute a quorum.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, at the first meeting, the board shall elect, by majority vote, a president who shall preside at all meetings and coordinate the functions and activities of the board. The president shall be elected or reelected each calendar year thereafter.

The adjutant general shall not serve as the president of the board.

The board shall meet at least two (2) times annually but may meet more frequently, as deemed necessary, subject to call by the president or by request of a majority of the board members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 2, effective April 25, 2006; 2012, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

36.474.
Eligibility for funds — Need-based applications by member’s spouse or dependent for necessary expenses — Expenditure of funds to benefit group of members, spouses, or dependents — Expenditure of funds to Adoption Assistance Program applicants — Adjutant general to award or decline — Identification of other funding sources available to applicant — Administrative regulations.

During active duty of a regular member of the United States Armed Forces deployed outside the United States who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, or any member of a state National Guard or a Reserve component who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, and for one hundred eighty (180) days following the end of deployment under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code or KRS

38.030

, as appropriate, trust fund moneys shall be used to support:

The person who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes;

The person’s Kentucky resident spouse;

The person’s dependent or dependents; or

A group of several members of the military or their families as described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection.

An application for a trust fund grant may be filed by the member who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes or his or her Kentucky resident spouse. The application shall be accompanied by an appropriate authorization to access personnel information contained in the military database Defense Enrollment Reporting System (DEERS) for verification purposes.

Subject to the availability of trust fund moneys, the adjutant general shall award a grant to an applicant described in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subsection (1) of this section if that person’s application is need-based, and the amount of the grant does not exceed the dollar cap established by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A. An application shall be need-based if:

Funds are requested for necessary expenses incurred, or to be incurred. Necessary expenses shall include but not be limited to:

Housing;

Utilities;

Groceries;

Health insurance copay; and

Child care;

The necessary expenses created, or will create, an undue hardship on a person referred to in subsection (1) of this section;

The applicant does not have reasonable access to any other funding source, whether public or private; and

The military family assistance trust fund is the last resort.

Subject to the availability of trust fund moneys, the adjutant general may expend trust fund money, in amounts not to exceed the dollar cap established by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A, to benefit individuals described in subsection (1)(d) of this section if:

The individuals have a demonstrated need that affects their health, safety, or well-being; and

A majority of the members of the military family assistance trust fund board has approved the expenditure, verbally or in writing.

Subject to the availability of trust fund moneys, the director of the Kentucky National Guard Family Services Program within the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs may expend trust fund money, in amounts not to exceed the dollar cap established by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A, to benefit individuals described in subsection (1) of this section if:

The individuals have a demonstrated need that affects their health, safety, or well-being; and

A majority of the members of the military family assistance trust fund board has approved the expenditure, verbally or in writing.

Subject to the availability of military family assistance trust fund moneys, the adjutant general shall expend trust fund money to eligible applicants to the Kentucky National Guard Adoption Assistance Program as provided in KRS

36.477

. Eligible applicants to the Kentucky National Guard Adoption Assistance Program shall not be subject to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

The adjutant general shall award or decline to award a grant within sixty (60) days of receiving an application.

If the adjutant general awards or declines to award a grant, he or she shall state in writing the reason for the decision and keep the writing on file.

If the adjutant general declines to award a grant, he or she shall provide the applicant with a copy of the writing referred to in paragraph (b) of this subsection. In addition, if the adjutant general declines to award a grant due to the availability of public or private funds, the adjutant general shall identify the source of available funds for the applicant and provide assistance with regard to seeking funds from that source.

The military family assistance trust fund board shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section. These regulations shall, at a minimum, enhance administrative efficiency and limit the dollar amount that a person may receive in grants per twelve (12) month period.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 3, effective April 25, 2006; 2010, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 7, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2022 ch. 171, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

36.476.
Annual report by board.

Each year between August 15 and September 1, the military family assistance trust fund board shall provide a written report to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Interim Joint Committee on Seniors, Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection. The written report shall provide:

The board’s activities during the previous fiscal year;

What moneys were spent out of the military family assistance trust fund for what purposes;

The amount of money left in the fund; and

Any recommendations for future initiatives with regard to the trust fund and its administration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 4, effective April 25, 2006.

36.477.
Kentucky National Guard Adoption Assistance Program.

There is hereby established the Kentucky National Guard Adoption Assistance Program to be administered by the Kentucky Department of Military Affairs.

Any member of the Kentucky National Guard who finalizes a legal adoption procedure for the adoption of a child, other than the child of a spouse, on or after July 12, 2012, shall be eligible to receive reimbursement from the military family assistance trust fund as provided in KRS

36.474

for actual costs associated with the adoption of the child, including a child with special needs. For the purposes of this section, a child with special needs means the same as defined in KRS 199.555(1).

The eligible member of the Kentucky National Guard shall receive:

Up to seven thousand dollars ($7,000) in unreimbursed direct costs related to the adoption of a child with special needs; or

Up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) in unreimbursed direct costs related to the adoption of any other child.

Unreimbursed direct costs related to the adoption of a child with special needs or other child shall include:

Licensed adoption agency fees;

Legal fees;

Medical costs;

Court costs; and

Other fees or costs associated with the child adoption in accordance with state and federal law and after review and approval by the court at the finalization of the adoption.

Application for financial assistance shall be made by submitting a completed Kentucky National Guard adoption assistance application to the adjutant general along with documentary evidence of:

Finalization of the adoption; and

Certification by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that the adopted child is a child with special needs, if reimbursement for special needs adoption is sought.

If both adoptive parents are members of the Kentucky National Guard, the application for financial assistance shall be made jointly and the amount of reimbursement shall be limited to that specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Upon approval of the application for financial assistance, the adjutant general shall dispense funds from the military family assistance trust fund to the eligible applicant.

The Department of Military Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2021 ch. 19, § 1, effective March 15, 2021.

36.478.
“Mission: Welcome Home” Program. [Repealed.]

36.480.
Web publication of information and links to assist military spouses with credentialing.

The Kentucky Department of Military Affairs shall publish and periodically update information on its Web site to assist military spouses in obtaining professional and occupational licenses, certificates, registrations, permits, and other credentials. At a minimum, the department’s Web site shall provide links to relevant Department of Defense and Kentucky state agency Web sites.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 6, effective April 25, 2006; 2007, ch. 55, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). A manifest clerical or typographical error in this section has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS

7.136

.